Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 1. Watercourses Generally.

§§ 62.1-1 through 62.1-4.
Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to fisheries and habitat of the tidal waters, see §

28.2-100

et seq.

Editor’s note.

At its regular session of 1966 the General Assembly directed the Code Commission to revise certain titles of the Code, including Title 62, relating to waters of the State, ports and harbors. In December of 1967, the Commission sent to the Governor and General Assembly a report containing the proposed revision of Title 62, which was published as House Document 9 of the 1968 session. This report contained revisor’s notes and other explanatory matter. The Commission’s draft of the revision of Title 62, as amended by the General Assembly, became chapter 659 of the Acts of 1968. Effective Oct. 1, 1968, it repealed Title 62 of the Code and enacted a new Title 62.1. Pursuant to § 30-152, the Code Commission incorporated in Title 62.1 the amendments to Title 62 enacted at the 1968 session of the General Assembly.

Subsequently, Acts 1992, c. 836, which revised and recodified the tidal fishing and habitat laws of Virginia, by inter alia, adding a Title 28.2 and repealing Title 28.1, repealed §§

62.1-1

through 62.1-4,

62.1-9.1

,

62.1-13.1

through 62.1-13.20,

62.1-13.21

through 62.1-13.28, and

62.1-194.1:1

.

Some of the cases cited in the notes under the various sections of this title were decided under corresponding provisions of former Title 62.

§ 62.1-5.
Repealed by Acts 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

As to game, inland fisheries and boating, see §

29.1-100

et seq.

§ 62.1-6.
Clearing watercourses between counties of obstructions.

The circuit court of any county which is divided by a watercourse from another county or through any part of which a watercourse passes may, by itself or in conjunction with the circuit court or circuit courts of any other county or counties, contract with any person or order laborers to be hired to clear such watercourse of obstructions in such manner and to such extent as may seem to it proper, and there shall be charged on any county whatever sum the court thereof may agree to pay for such purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-4; 1968, c. 659.

Cross references.

As to improvement of navigability of streams, see §§

62.1-155

through

62.1-158

.

For other provisions relative to obstruction of watercourses, see §§

62.1-164

,

62.1-194

through

62.1-194.3

.

§ 62.1-7.
Rights of improving navigation preserved; dams, etc.

Whatever power is reserved to the General Assembly by any act heretofore passed to abate or remove any dam or other works in a watercourse, or to improve its navigation, shall continue in full force. And in no case shall the right of the Commonwealth, or of any company incorporated for opening, improving, or extending the navigation of any watercourse, to preference in the use of the water flowing therein for the purposes of such navigation be affected by any order of court, which, since the first day of April, 1816, has been made, or hereafter may be made, granting leave to any person to erect a dam or other obstruction across or in such watercourse.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-5; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-8.
Limitation on power of courts to grant leave to erect dams.

Where a watercourse is navigable, or by law declared a public highway, no court shall grant leave to any person to erect in that part of it any dam which will obstruct ordinary navigation or the passage of fish; and where any law has been or shall be enacted for opening, improving or extending the navigation of a watercourse no court shall, while such law is in force, grant leave to any person to erect any dam or other obstruction across or in such watercourse which will in any way interfere with the navigation thereof without express authority of law or the consent of the company incorporated to open, improve or extend such navigation. Any such dam shall, notwithstanding it may be built under such leave, be deemed a nuisance, and may be abated as such, or such company or the Commonwealth may make a lock or locks in such dam for the passage of vessels and boats without being required to make any compensation therefor.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-6; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-9.
Construction of two preceding sections.

Sections

62.1-7

and

62.1-8

shall not be construed to give any greater or other right to any person who has erected or may erect any dam or other obstruction across or in any watercourse, than such person would have had if such sections had not been enacted.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-7; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-9.1.
Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to fisheries and habitat of the tidal waters, see §

28.2-100

et seq.